Alabama, session 2026rs, HB595.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. This act shall be known as the Rural
Emergency Medical Services Support Act.
Section 2. As used in this act, unless otherwise
specified or unless the context requires otherwise, the
following terms will have the following meanings:
(1) COMMUNITY PARAMEDICINE. EMS-based delivery of
Page 1

(1) COMMUNITY PARAMEDICINE. EMS-based delivery of
HB595 INTRODUCED
non-emergency services such as home visits, chronic disease
monitoring, and care coordination.
(2) DEPARTMENT. The Alabama Department of Public
Health's Office of Emergency Medical Services.
(3) ELIGIBLE EMS PROVIDER. A licensed emergency medical
transport provider as defined in Section 40-26B-90(6), Code of
Alabama 1975, that primarily serves rural or frontier areas.
Section 3. (a) A grant program to support operational
costs of eligible EMS providers is established. The department
shall administer the program.
(b) Grant funds may be used for any of the following:
(1) Purchase or maintenance of vehicles and equipment.
(2) Training and certification of personnel.
(3) Insurance, fuel, and administrative expenses.
(c) Priority shall be given to providers with service
gaps or high per-capita coverage areas.
(d) Operation of this program is conditional on the
availability of funding.
Section 4. (a) Subject to funding being available for
such purposes, the department shall fund rural EMS training
initiatives including:
(1) Scholarships of rural students entering EMT or
paramedic training. Scholarship amounts will be based on
student need as determined by the department;
(2) Tuition support for current volunteers; and
(3) High school EMS exposure and dual enrollment
programs.
(b) Programs must include rural clinical placements and
Page 2

(b) Programs must include rural clinical placements and
HB595 INTRODUCED
cultural competency training.
(c) Operation of this program is conditional on the
availability of funding.
Section 5. (a) The department shall authorize up to 10
pilot programs allowing EMS agencies to provide community
paramedicine services.
(b) Permitted services may include:
(1) Post-discharge follow-up visits;
(2) Chronic care monitoring; and
(3) Preventative education and care coordination.
(c) Each pilot program must partner with at least one
primary care provider.
Section 6. (a) EMS providers participating in
authorized community paramedicine programs are deemed to be
acting within scope of practice.
(b) The Alabama Medicaid Agency shall reimburse EMS
agencies for approved non-emergency services delivered under
this act.
(c) The department shall develop applicable regulations
and billing codes.
Section 7. (a) The department shall conduct a
statewide EMS needs assessment every two years to:
(1) Identify rural coverage gaps and staffing
shortages;
(2) Evaluate infrastructure needs and aging vehicle
fleets; and
(3) Report on regional response time metrics.
(b) The report shall be submitted to the Legislature
Page 3

(b) The report shall be submitted to the Legislature
HB595 INTRODUCED
and made publicly available.
Section 8. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 4